District of Columbia statutes.
1-1106.02

Repealed

Disclosure of financial interest.

Repealed.

Aug. 14, 1974, 88 Stat. 467, Pub. L. 93-376, title VI, § 602
Oct. 10, 1975, D.C. Law 1-21, § 7(c), 22 DCR 2069
Oct. 30, 1975, D.C. Law 1-27, § 3(d), 22 DCR 2471
Sept. 2, 1976, D.C. Law 1-79, title II, § 203, 23 DCR 2050
Apr. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 1-126, title I, § 102(a), (c), title IV, § 402, 24 DCR 2372
Aug. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-101, § 3, 25 DCR 257
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(w), 25 DCR 5740
Apr. 23, 1980, D.C. Law 3-58,§ 2(c)-(f), 27 DCR 963
Aug. 1, 1981, D.C. Law 4-23, § 2, 28 DCR 2616
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-88, § 3(l), (p)-(s), 29 DCR 458
Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-111, §§ 2(a), 3, 31 DCR 3952
Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97,§ 23(c), 33 DCR 703
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-192, § 21, 33 DCR 7836
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 6, 36 DCR 492
Oct. 18, 1989, D.C. Law 8-41, § 2(a), 36 DCR 5758
June 8, 1990, D.C. Law 8-135, § 3, 37 DCR 2616
Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-241, § 3, 40 DCR 629
Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-153, § 16, 41 DCR 4652
May 16, 1995, D.C. Law 10-255, § 4, 41 DCR 5193
April 5, 2000, D.C. Law 13-79, § 2(e), 46 DCR 10460
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 124(e), 47 DCR 520
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-283, § 4, 48 DCR 1917
June 19, 2001, D.C. Law 13-313, § 6, 48 DCR 1873
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 4, 49 DCR 8140
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 25, 51 DCR 881
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 4004(a), 52 DCR 7503
Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 128, 52 DCR 10637
Sept. 12, 2008, D.C. Law 17-231, § 6(c), 55 DCR 6758
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-363, § 3(c), 58 DCR 963
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(d), 59 DCR 1862
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 17, 59 DCR 6190
This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.
1981 Ed., § 1-1462.
1973 Ed., § 1-1182.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 would have substituted “Real Property Tax Appeals Commission for the District of Columbia” for “Board of Real Property Assessments and Appeals” in the introductory language of (a).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 4 of the Legal Services Clarification and Technical Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-203, December 8, 1999, 46 DCR 10456).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 4 of the Legal Services Clarification and Technical Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-293, March 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2063).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4004(a) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(d) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).
Amendment of Organization Order No. 112, establishing Board of Appeals and Review: See Mayor’s Order 84-31, February 9, 1984.

Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1988 changed the name of the Commission from the Educational Institution Licensure Commission to the Education Licensure Commission.

D.C. Law 7-231 in subsection (a) inserted “and each member of the Retirement Board”. This language was omitted from this section as codified between June, 1990, and September, 2008.

Termination of Federal Disclosure Requirements: See Pub. L. 99-573, § 6.